Illinois, session 104th, HB2226.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Early Education Act is amended by changing 5Section 145-1 as follows: 6    (325 ILCS 21/145-1)7    Sec. 145-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Early Education Act. References in this Article to "this 9Act" means this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-654, eff. 3-8-21.)